Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. RECODIFICATION Section 1, Chapter 271, O.S.L.
2024 (2 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6-520), shall be recodified as
Section 1101 of Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11133 JL 12/12/24





Req. No. 11133 Page 1